Florida, session 2026, SB1138.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 113 114 Section 1.âSection 125.022, Florida Statutes, is amended to 115 read: 116 125.022âDevelopment permits and orders; development 117 preapplication consulting services program required.â 118 (1)(a)âBy January 1, 2027, each county with a population of 119 75,000 or greater shall create and implement a program for the 120 purpose of making available development preapplication 121 consultation services at an applicantâs request. This subsection 122 may not be construed to affect or require the modification of a 123 county program that makes available the same or substantially 124 similar development preapplication consulting services to an 125 applicant for a development permit or development order, 126 including a program that requires mandatory preapplication 127 meetings for specified types of developments, if such county 128 program exists on or before July 1, 2026. 129 1.âThe preapplication consultation services authorized in 130 this subsection are limited to those applications for permits as 131 defined in s. 163.3169. 132 2.âThe county may use a qualified contractor or a qualified 133 contractor firm as defined in s. 163.3169 to fulfill the 134 preapplication consultation services required in this 135 subsection. 136 (b)âA development preapplication consultation services 137 program must, at minimum, provide all of the following: 138 1.âThe minimum information that must be submitted in an 139 application for a permit as defined in s. 163.3169. 140 2.âThe review and precertification of completeness of the 141 application and all related documents, including site 142 engineering plans or site plans or their functional equivalent, 143 or plats, and their compliance with all relevant existing land 144 development regulations. 145 (c)âIf an applicant chooses to use the development 146 preapplication consultation services program, the county, upon 147 receipt of the proposed development application, shall confirm 148 receipt, verify completeness, and issue a written notification 149 to the applicant indicating that all required information has 150 been submitted, or specify in writing with particularity any 151 deficiencies in the application, within 5 business days. If the 152 application is deficient, the applicant has 30 days to address 153 the deficiencies by submitting the required additional 154 information. If the county fails to issue the written 155 notification within 5 business days, the application is deemed 156 complete by operation of law without conditions, and the county 157 must process the application as required in paragraph (d). 158 (d)1.âUpon receipt of the applicantâs completed 159 application, the county must process the application for final 160 action and must approve, approve with conditions, or deny the 161 application within 45 days after submission of a complete 162 application, except the county may not review again those plans 163 specified in subparagraph (b)2. 164 2.âIf the county fails to take final action to approve, 165 approve with conditions, or deny the application within 45 days, 166 the applicant shall notify the county in writing. If the county 167 fails to respond within 10 days, the application is deemed 168 approved by operation of law without conditions, and the 169 applicant is entitled to proceed with the proposed activity or 170 development as though the county had granted unconditional 171 approval. Approval pursuant to this subparagraph may not be 172 construed to relieve the applicant of the obligation to comply 173 with all other applicable federal, state, and local laws, 174 regulations, and ordinances. 175 (2)âIf an applicant for a development permit or development 176 order is not eligible, does not request, or elects not to use 177 the countyâs development preapplication consulting services 178 program pursuant to subsection (1), all of the following 179 requirements shall apply: 180 (a)(1)âA county shall specify in writing the minimum 181 information that must be submitted in an application for a 182 zoning approval, rezoning approval, subdivision approval, 183 certification, special exception, or variance. A county shall 184 make the minimum information available for inspection and 185 copying at the location where the county receives applications 186 for development permits and orders, provide the information to 187 the applicant at a preapplication meeting, or post the 188 information on the countyâs website. 189 (b)1.(2)âWithin 5 business days after receiving an 190 application for approval of a development permit or development 191 order, a county shall confirm receipt of the application using 192 contact information provided by the applicant. Within 30 days 193 after receiving an application for approval of a development 194 permit or development order, a county must review the 195 application for completeness and issue a written notification to 196 the applicant indicating that all required information is 197 submitted or specify in writing with particularity any areas 198 that are deficient. If the application is deficient, the 199 applicant has 30 days to address the deficiencies by submitting 200 the required additional information. 201 2.âFor applications that do not require final action 202 through a quasi-judicial hearing or a public hearing, the county 203 must approve, approve with conditions, or deny the application 204 for a development permit or development order within 120 days 205 after the county has deemed the application complete. 206 3.âFor applications that require final action through a 207 quasi-judicial hearing or a public hearing, the county must 208 approve, approve with conditions, or deny the application for a 209 development permit or development order within 180 days after 210 the county has deemed the application complete. 211 4.âBoth parties may agree in writing or in a public meeting 212 or hearing to an extension of time, particularly in the event of 213 a force majeure or other extraordinary circumstance. An 214 approval, approval with conditions, or denial of the application 215 for a development permit or development order must include 216 written findings supporting the countyâs decision. 217 218 The timeframes contained in this paragraph subsection do not 219 apply in an area of critical state concern, as designated in s. 220 380.0552. The timeframes contained in this paragraph subsection 221 restart if an applicant makes a substantive change to the 222 application. As used in this paragraph subsection, the term 223 âsubstantive changeâ means an applicant-initiated change of 15 224 percent or more in the proposed density, intensity, or square 225 footage of a parcel. 226 (c)1.(3)(a)âWhen reviewing an application for a development 227 permit or development order that is certified by a professional 228 listed in s. 403.0877, a county may not request additional 229 information from the applicant more than three times, unless the 230 applicant waives the limitation in writing. 231 2.(b)âIf a county makes a request for additional 232 information and the applicant submits the required additional 233 information within 30 days after receiving the request, the 234 county must review the application for completeness and issue a 235 letter indicating that all required information has been 236 submitted or specify with particularity any areas that are 237 deficient within 30 days after receiving the additional 238 information. 239 3.(c)âIf a county makes a second request for additional 240 information and the applicant submits the required additional 241 information within 30 days after receiving the request, the 242 county must review the application for completeness and issue a 243 letter indicating that all required information has been 244 submitted or specify with particularity any areas that are 245 deficient within 10 days after receiving the additional 246 information. 247 4.(d)âBefore a third request for additional information, 248 the applicant must be offered a meeting to attempt to resolve 249 outstanding issues. If a county makes a third request for 250 additional information and the applicant submits the required 251 additional information within 30 days after receiving the 252 request, the county must deem the application complete within 10 253 days after receiving the additional information or proceed to 254 process the application for approval or denial unless the 255 applicant waived the countyâs limitation in writing as described 256 in subparagraph 1. paragraph (a). 257 5.(e)âExcept as provided in subsection (4) subsection (7), 258 if the applicant believes the request for additional information 259 is not authorized by ordinance, rule, statute, or other legal 260 authority, the county, at the applicantâs request, shall proceed 261 to process the application for approval or denial. 262 (d)(4)âA county must issue a refund to an applicant equal 263 to: 264 1.(a)âTen percent of the application fee if the county 265 fails to issue written notification of completeness or written 266 specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days after 267 receiving the application. 268 2.(b)âTen percent of the application fee if the county 269 fails to issue a written notification of completeness or written 270 specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days after 271 receiving the additional information pursuant to subparagraph 272 (c)2. paragraph (3)(b). 273 3.(c)âTwenty percent of the application fee if the county 274 fails to issue a written notification of completeness or written 275 specification of areas of deficiency within 10 days after 276 receiving the additional information pursuant to subparagraph 277 (c)3. paragraph (3)(c). 278 4.(d)âFifty percent of the application fee if the county 279 fails to approve, approves with conditions, or denies the 280 application within 30 days after conclusion of the 120-day 281 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)2. or the 180-day 282 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)3. subsection (2). 283 5.(e)âOne hundred percent of the application fee if the 284 county fails to approve, approves with conditions, or denies an 285 application 31 days or more after conclusion of the 120-day 286 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)2. or the 180-day 287 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)3. subsection (2). 288 289 A county is not required to issue a refund if the applicant and 290 the county agree to an extension of time, the delay is caused by 291 the applicant, or the delay is attributable to a force majeure 292 or other extraordinary circumstance. 293 (e)(5)âWhen a county denies an application for a 294 development permit or development order, the county shall give 295 written notice to the applicant. The notice must include a 296 citation to the applicable portions of an ordinance, rule, 297 statute, or other legal authority for the denial of the permit 298 or order. 299 (3)(6)âAs used in this section, the terms âdevelopment 300 permitâ and âdevelopment orderâ have the same meaning as in s. 301 163.3164, but do not include building permits. 302 (4)(7)âFor any development permit application filed with 303 the county after July 1, 2012, a county may not require as a 304 condition of processing or issuing a development permit or 305 development order that an applicant obtain a permit or approval 306 from any state or federal agency unless the agency has issued a 307 final agency action that denies the federal or state permit 308 before the county action on the local development permit. 309 (5)(8)âIssuance of a development permit or development 310 order by a county does not in any way create any rights on the 311 part of the applicant to obtain a permit from a state or federal 312 agency and does not create any liability on the part of the 313 county for issuance of the permit if the applicant fails to 314 obtain requisite approvals or fulfill the obligations imposed by 315 a state or federal agency or undertakes actions that result in a 316 violation of state or federal law. A county shall attach such a 317 disclaimer to the issuance of a development permit and shall 318 include a permit condition that all other applicable state or 319 federal permits be obtained before commencement of the 320 development. 321 (6)(9)âThis section does not prohibit a county from 322 providing information to an applicant regarding what other state 323 or federal permits may apply. 324 Section 2.âSection 163.3169, Florida Statutes, is created 325 to read: 326 163.3169âUsing qualified contractors in development order 327 preapplication review.â 328 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 329 (a)ââApplicantâ means a person or legal entity having a 330 legal or equitable ownership interest in real property, or an 331 authorized agent acting on behalf of such person or entity, 332 which applies for a land development approval from the local 333 government pursuant to this section. 334 (b)ââApplicationâ means a properly completed and submitted 335 request for a permit, as defined herein, on behalf of an 336 applicant which includes an affidavit from a qualified 337 contractor as required by this section. The term does not 338 include plans or permits as reviewed under s. 553.791. 339 (c)ââConflict of interestâ has the same meaning as in s. 340 112.312 and includes conflicts of interest recognized under 341 applicable licensing or certification standards applicable to 342 the qualified contractor. 343 (d)ââDevelopment services officeâ means the entity, office, 344 division, or department of a local government which is 345 responsible for reviewing applications for compliance with the 346 local governmentâs land development regulations and other 347 applicable federal, state, and local requirements. This office 348 may be substantively identical to or housed within the local 349 governmentâs planning and zoning department. 350 (e)ââDevelopment services officialâ means the individual in 351 the development services office of the governing jurisdiction 352 who is responsible for the direct regulatory administration or 353 supervision of the review and approval process required to 354 indicate compliance with applicable land development 355 regulations. The term includes any duly authorized designee of 356 such person. This individual may be the executive director of 357 the governing body of a local government or the division 358 director of the local governmentâs planning and zoning 359 department. 360 (f)ââFinal platâ has the same meaning as in s. 177.073. 361 (g)ââGoverning bodyâ has the same meaning as in s. 362 163.3164. 363 (h)ââLand development regulationsâ has the same meaning as 364 in s. 163.3164, but excludes building permits and plans subject 365 to s. 553.791. 366 (i)ââLocal governmentâ means: 367 1.âA county that has 75,000 or more residents, but does not 368 include a county subject to s. 380.0552; or 369 2.âA municipality that has 10,000 or more residents. 370 (j)ââPermitâ means an authorization, approval, or grant by 371 a local governing body which authorizes the development of land 372 for any site plan or development plan approval, or any 373 subdivision approval, as defined in this section. 374 (k)ââPlansâ has the same meaning as in s. 177.073. 375 (l)ââPlat or replatâ has the same meaning as in s. 376 177.031(14). 377 (m)ââPreapplication reviewâ means the analysis of a permit 378 conducted by a qualified contractor to ensure compliance with a 379 comprehensive plan, chapter 177, and applicable land development 380 regulations, and which is part of the application as authorized 381 under this section. 382 (n)ââPreliminary platâ has the same meaning as in 177.073. 383 (o)ââQualified contractorâ means the individual or firm 384 that has demonstrated knowledge of and experience with the types 385 of permits or development approvals specified in this section. 386 The term includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: 387 1.âAn engineer or engineering firm licensed under chapter 388 471. 389 2.âA surveyor or mapper, or a surveyorâs or mapperâs firm, 390 licensed under chapter 472. 391 3.âAn architect or architecture firm licensed under part I 392 of chapter 481. 393 4.âA landscape architect or a landscape architecture firm 394 registered under part II of chapter 481. 395 5.âA planner certified by the American Institute of 396 Certified Planners with at least 5 years of relevant government 397 experience or at least 10 years of experience as an urban 398 planner if not certified. 399 (p)ââQualified contractor firmâ means a business 400 organization, including a corporation, partnership, business 401 trust, or other legal entity, which offers services under this 402 section to the public through licensees who act as agents, 403 employees, officers, or partners of the firm. A person who is 404 licensed as an engineer under chapter 471; a surveyor or mapper 405 licensed under chapter 472; an architect licensed under part I 406 of chapter 481; a landscape architect licensed under part II of 407 chapter 481; or who is certified by the American Institute of 408 Certified Planners with at least 5 years of relevant government 409 experience, or at least 10 years of relevant experience as an 410 urban planner if not certified, may act as a qualified 411 contractor for an agent, employee, or officer of the qualified 412 contractor firm. 413 (q)ââSite plan or development plan approvalâ means a site 414 development proposal, or its functional equivalent, including a 415 modification to an existing development approval, which is 416 expressly designated by the local government for administrative 417 review and approval by local government staff or a designated 418 administrative official, without the requirement of approval by 419 an appointed review board or a governing body and which does not 420 materially increase density, intensity, traffic, infrastructure 421 demand, environmental impacts, or significant offsite impacts, 422 and therefore does not require full site plan review or 423 discretionary policy review. The term includes approvals or 424 permits governed by objective, nondiscretionary standards that 425 are designated by the local government for administrative 426 approval by local government staff or an administrative official 427 and which also includes, but is not limited to approvals or 428 permits related to trees, signs, landscaping, and minor 429 modifications. 430 (r)ââSubdivision approvalâ or its functional equivalent, 431 including a modification, means an administrative review process 432 applicable to the division of land into a limited number of lots 433 which does not create new public streets or require significant 434 public infrastructure improvements and does not materially 435 increase development impacts. The term applies only to approvals 436 expressly designated by the local government for administrative 437 review and approval by local government staff or a designated 438 administrator without the requirement of approval by an 439 appointed review board or a governing body. A subdivision 440 qualifies under this definition if it involves a number of lots 441 as specified by the local government, complies with all 442 applicable zoning, dimensional, access utility, and 443 environmental standards, and can be served by existing public 444 facilities or approved private systems, allowing the subdivision 445 to be reviewed for compliance with objective standards of land 446 development code and approved by local government staff or a 447 designated administrative official without requiring 448 discretionary policy determinations. 449 (2)âREGISTRY.â 450 (a)âBy January 1, 2027, a local government shall establish 451 a registry of at least four qualified contractors or two 452 qualified contractor firms which the governing body shall use to 453 supplement the local governmentâs staff resources in ways 454 determined by the governing body upon the written request by an 455 applicant for fulfilling: 456 1.âThe preapplication consultation services for permits 457 under s. 125.022(1) and s. 166.033(1); 458 2.âThe requirements of s. 177.073 for processing and 459 expediting the review of an application for a preliminary plat 460 or any plans related to such application; or 461 3.âThe requirements of s. 177.071 requiring the 462 administrative approval of a plat or replat. 463 (b)âA qualified contractor or a qualified contractor firm 464 on the registry which is hired pursuant to this section may not 465 have a conflict of interest. If a prohibitive conflict of 466 interest exists, the applicant may use an otherwise qualified 467 contractor. 468 (c)âA local government may enter into an agreement with 469 another local government for the purpose of using public 470 employees who meet the requirements for a qualified contractor 471 to satisfy the minimum numerical requirements for qualified 472 contractors for the registry. A local government may not add its 473 own employees to its own registry. 474 (d)âIf a local government fails to establish or maintain 475 the registry, an applicant may, at its sole discretion, retain a 476 qualified contractor or a qualified contractor firm of the 477 applicantâs choosing to provide preapplication consultation 478 services, provided that the selected qualified contractor or 479 qualified contractor firm does not have a conflict of interest. 480 If a conflict of interest is identified after selection, the 481 applicant must promptly replace the qualified contractor or 482 qualified contractor firm with one that has no conflict of 483 interest. 484 (e)âThe local government may not condition, deny, or delay 485 the applicantâs selection or use of such qualified contractor or 486 qualified contractor firm, and the applicant is responsible for 487 all fees and costs associated with the qualified contractor or 488 qualified contractor firm used in this manner. 489 (f)âIf an applicant uses a qualified contractor or a 490 qualified contractor firm for such purpose, the local government 491 must provide access to public records and information reasonably 492 necessary to perform preapplication consultation services. This 493 paragraph does not authorize the disclosure of records that are 494 confidential or exempt from public inspection or copying under 495 chapter 119 or any other applicable law, and access to such 496 records is provided only to the extent permitted by law. This 497 paragraph may not be construed to require a local government to 498 violate the licensing terms of proprietary software or related 499 vendor agreements. 500 (3)âAPPLICABILITY; HISTORIC PRESERVATION.â 501 (a)âThis section does not apply to an application for a 502 permit if the property that is the subject of the application 503 is: 504 1.âIndividually listed in the National Register of Historic 505 Places or is a contributing property within a National Register 506 listed historic district; 507 2.âDesignated as a local historic landmark, historic 508 resource, or part of a locally designated historic district 509 under a duly adopted local historic preservation ordinance; or 510 3.âSubject to binding historic preservation review or 511 approval under federal, state, or local law, including review by 512 a local historic preservation board or commission. 513 (b)âIf an application encompasses multiple parcels or 514 improvements, this subsection applies only to the portion of the 515 application that relates to property described in paragraph (a). 516 This subsection may not be construed to prohibit the use of a 517 qualified contractor for the portions of an application that do 518 not involve the property listed in paragraph (a). 519 Section 3.âSection 166.033, Florida Statutes, is amended to 520 read: 521 166.033âDevelopment permits and orders; development 522 preapplication consulting services program required.â 523 (1)(a)âBy January 1, 2027, each municipality with a 524 population of 10,000 or greater shall create and implement a 525 program for the purpose of making available development 526 preapplication consultation services at an applicantâs request. 527 This subsection may not be construed to affect or require the 528 modification of a municipal program that makes available the 529 same or substantially similar development preapplication 530 consulting services to an applicant for a development permit or 531 development order, including a program that requires mandatory 532 preapplication meetings for specified types of developments, if 533 such municipal program exists on or before July 1, 2026. 534 1.âThe preapplication consultation services authorized in 535 this subsection are limited to those applications for permits as 536 defined in s. 163.3169. 537 2.âThe municipality may use a qualified contractor or a 538 qualified contractor firm as defined in s. 163.3169 to fulfill 539 the preapplication consultation services required in this 540 subsection. 541 (b)âA development preapplication consultation services 542 program must, at minimum, provide all of the following: 543 1.âThe minimum information that must be submitted in an 544 application for a permit as defined in s. 163.3169. 545 2.âThe review and precertification of completeness of the 546 application and all related documents, including site 547 engineering plans or site plans or their functional equivalent, 548 or plats, and their compliance with all relevant existing land 549 development regulations. 550 (c)âIf an applicant chooses to use the development 551 preapplication consultation services program, the municipality, 552 upon receipt of the proposed development application, shall 553 confirm receipt, verify completeness, and issue a written 554 notification to the applicant indicating that all required 555 information has been submitted, or specify in writing with 556 particularity any deficiencies within 5 business days. If the 557 application is deficient, the applicant has 30 days to address 558 the deficiencies by submitting the required information. If the 559 municipality fails to issue the written notification within 5 560 business days, the application is deemed complete by operation 561 of law without conditions, and the municipality must process the 562 application as required in paragraph (d). 563 (d)1.âUpon receipt of the applicantâs completed 564 application, the municipality must process the application for 565 final action and must approve, approve with conditions, or deny 566 the application within 45 days after submission of a complete 567 application, except the municipality may not review again those 568 plans specified in subparagraph (b)2. 569 2.âIf the municipality fails to take final action to 570 approve, approve with conditions, or deny the application within 571 the 45 days, the applicant shall notify the municipality in 572 writing. If the municipality fails to respond within 10 days, 573 the application is deemed approved by operation of law without 574 conditions, and the applicant is entitled to proceed with the 575 proposed activity or development as though the municipality had 576 granted unconditional approval. Approval pursuant to this 577 subparagraph may not be construed to relieve the applicant of 578 the obligation to comply with all other applicable federal, 579 state, and local laws, regulations, and ordinances. 580 (2)âIf an applicant for a development permit or development 581 order is not eligible, does not request, or elects not to use 582 the municipalityâs development preapplication consulting 583 services program pursuant to subsection (1), all of the 584 following requirements shall apply: 585 (a)(1)âA municipality shall specify in writing the minimum 586 information that must be submitted for an application for a 587 zoning approval, rezoning approval, subdivision approval, 588 certification, special exception, or variance. A municipality 589 shall make the minimum information available for inspection and 590 copying at the location where the municipality receives 591 applications for development permits and orders, provide the 592 information to the applicant at a preapplication meeting, or 593 post the information on the municipalityâs website. 594 (b)1.(2)âWithin 5 business days after receiving an 595 application for approval of a development permit or development 596 order, a municipality shall confirm receipt of the application 597 using contact information provided by the applicant. Within 30 598 days after receiving an application for approval of a 599 development permit or development order, a municipality must 600 review the application for completeness and issue a written 601 notification to the applicant indicating that all required 602 information is submitted or specify in writing with 603 particularity any areas that are deficient. If the application 604 is deficient, the applicant has 30 days to address the 605 deficiencies by submitting the required additional information. 606 2.âFor applications that do not require final action 607 through a quasi-judicial hearing or a public hearing, the 608 municipality must approve, approve with conditions, or deny the 609 application for a development permit or development order within 610 120 days after the municipality has deemed the application 611 complete. 612 3.âFor applications that require final action through a 613 quasi-judicial hearing or a public hearing, the municipality 614 must approve, approve with conditions, or deny the application 615 for a development permit or development order within 180 days 616 after the municipality has deemed the application complete. 617 4.âBoth parties may agree in writing or in a public meeting 618 or hearing to an extension of time, particularly in the event of 619 a force majeure or other extraordinary circumstance. An 620 approval, approval with conditions, or denial of the application 621 for a development permit or development order must include 622 written findings supporting the municipalityâs decision. 623 624 The timeframes contained in this paragraph subsection do not 625 apply in an area of critical state concern, as designated in s. 626 380.0552 or chapter 28-36, Florida Administrative Code. The 627 timeframes contained in this paragraph subsection restart if an 628 applicant makes a substantive change to the application. As used 629 in this paragraph subsection, the term âsubstantive changeâ 630 means an applicant-initiated change of 15 percent or more in the 631 proposed density, intensity, or square footage of a parcel. 632 (c)1.(3)(a)âWhen reviewing an application for a development 633 permit or development order that is certified by a professional 634 listed in s. 403.0877, a municipality may not request additional 635 information from the applicant more than three times, unless the 636 applicant waives the limitation in writing. 637 2.(b)âIf a municipality makes a request for additional 638 information and the applicant submits the required additional 639 information within 30 days after receiving the request, the 640 municipality must review the application for completeness and 641 issue a letter indicating that all required information has been 642 submitted or specify with particularity any areas that are 643 deficient within 30 days after receiving the additional 644 information. 645 3.(c)âIf a municipality makes a second request for 646 additional information and the applicant submits the required 647 additional information within 30 days after receiving the 648 request, the municipality must review the application for 649 completeness and issue a letter indicating that all required 650 information has been submitted or specify with particularity any 651 areas that are deficient within 10 days after receiving the 652 additional information. 653 4.(d)âBefore a third request for additional information, 654 the applicant must be offered a meeting to attempt to resolve 655 outstanding issues. If a municipality makes a third request for 656 additional information and the applicant submits the required 657 additional information within 30 days after receiving the 658 request, the municipality must deem the application complete 659 within 10 days after receiving the additional information or 660 proceed to process the application for approval or denial unless 661 the applicant waived the municipalityâs limitation in writing as 662 described in paragraph (a). 663 5.(e)âExcept as provided in subsection (4) subsection (7), 664 if the applicant believes the request for additional information 665 is not authorized by ordinance, rule, statute, or other legal 666 authority, the municipality, at the applicantâs request, shall 667 proceed to process the application for approval or denial. 668 (d)(4)âA municipality must issue a refund to an applicant 669 equal to: 670 1.(a)âTen percent of the application fee if the 671 municipality fails to issue written notification of completeness 672 or written specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days 673 after receiving the application. 674 2.(b)âTen percent of the application fee if the 675 municipality fails to issue written notification of completeness 676 or written specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days 677 after receiving the additional information pursuant to 678 subparagraph (c)2. paragraph (3)(b). 679 3.(c)âTwenty percent of the application fee if the 680 municipality fails to issue written notification of completeness 681 or written specification of areas of deficiency within 10 days 682 after receiving the additional information pursuant to 683 subparagraph (c)3. paragraph (3)(c). 684 4.(d)âFifty percent of the application fee if the 685 municipality fails to approve, approves with conditions, or 686 denies the application within 30 days after conclusion of the 687 120-day timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)2. or the 180-day 688 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)3. subsection (2). 689 5.(e)âOne hundred percent of the application fee if the 690 municipality fails to approve, approves with conditions, or 691 denies an application 31 days or more after conclusion of the 692 120-day timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)2. or the 180-day 693 timeframe specified in subparagraph (b)3. subsection (2). 694 695 A municipality is not required to issue a refund if the 696 applicant and the municipality agree to an extension of time, 697 the delay is caused by the applicant, or the delay is 698 attributable to a force majeure or other extraordinary 699 circumstance. 700 (e)(5)âWhen a municipality denies an application for a 701 development permit or development order, the municipality shall 702 give written notice to the applicant. The notice must include a 703 citation to the applicable portions of an ordinance, rule, 704 statute, or other legal authority for the denial of the permit 705 or order. 706 (3)(6)âAs used in this section, the terms âdevelopment 707 permitâ and âdevelopment orderâ have the same meaning as in s. 708 163.3164, but do not include building permits. 709 (4)(7)âFor any development permit application filed with 710 the municipality after July 1, 2012, a municipality may not 711 require as a condition of processing or issuing a development 712 permit or development order that an applicant obtain a permit or 713 approval from any state or federal agency unless the agency has 714 issued a final agency action that denies the federal or state 715 permit before the municipal action on the local development 716 permit. 717 (5)(8)âIssuance of a development permit or development 718 order by a municipality does not create any right on the part of 719 an applicant to obtain a permit from a state or federal agency 720 and does not create any liability on the part of the 721 municipality for issuance of the permit if the applicant fails 722 to obtain requisite approvals or fulfill the obligations imposed 723 by a state or federal agency or undertakes actions that result 724 in a violation of state or federal law. A municipality shall 725 attach such a disclaimer to the issuance of development permits 726 and shall include a permit condition that all other applicable 727 state or federal permits be obtained before commencement of the 728 development. 729 (6)(9)âThis section does not prohibit a municipality from 730 providing information to an applicant regarding what other state 731 or federal permits may apply. 732 Section 4.âParagraphs (c) and (d) are added to subsection 733 (1) of section 177.071, Florida Statutes, to read: 734 177.071âAdministrative approval of plats or replats by 735 designated county or municipal official.â 736 (1) 737 (c)âA governing body and its designated administrative 738 authority shall use, upon the written request of the applicant, 739 the registry established in s. 163.3169 to supplement local 740 government staff resources in ways determined by the governing 741 body for processing and expediting the requirements of this 742 section. 743 (d)âA local government may not create, establish, or apply 744 any additional local procedure or condition for the 745 administrative approval of a plat or replat under this section 746 which is inconsistent with this section or s. 177.091. If 747 infrastructure financial assurances are required as a condition 748 of plat or replat approval, the administrative authority 749 designated in paragraph (a) must receive and act upon the 750 proposed assurance. The local government shall accept commonly 751 used forms of financial assurance, including performance bonds, 752 letters of credit, and escrow agreements, provided that the 753 assurance is in a form reasonably acceptable to the local 754 government and issued by a financially responsible issuer 755 meeting objective, uniformly applied standards. Local government 756 review of such financial assurance shall be limited to verifying 757 that the amount, form, and issuer satisfy the requirements of s. 758 177.091(8) and (9) and the local governmentâs uniformly applied 759 standards, and may not be used to unreasonably delay approval. 760 If the assurance is deficient, the local government must provide 761 written notice of deficiencies within 10 business days. 762 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1), paragraphs (a) 763 and (b) of subsection (2), paragraph (a) of subsection (3), 764 subsection (4), paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (6), and 765 subsection (8) of section 177.073, Florida Statutes, are 766 amended, and paragraph (d) is added to subsection (2) of that 767 section, to read: 768 177.073âExpedited approval of residential building permits 769 before a final plat is recorded.â 770 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 771 (a)ââApplicantâ means a homebuilder or developer who files 772 an application with the local governing body to identify the 773 percentage of planned homes, or the number of building permits, 774 that the local governing body must issue for a residential 775 subdivision or one or more phases in a multiphased planned 776 community, subdivision, or planned community. 777 (2)(a)âBy October 1, 2024, the governing body of a county 778 that has 75,000 residents or more and any governing body of a 779 municipality that has 10,000 residents or more and 25 acres or 780 more of contiguous land that the local government has designated 781 in the local governmentâs comprehensive plan and future land use 782 map as land that is agricultural or to be developed for 783 residential purposes shall create a program to expedite the 784 process for issuing building permits for residential 785 subdivisions or one or more phases in a multiphased planned 786 community, subdivision, or planned communities in accordance 787 with the Florida Building Code and this section before a final 788 plat is recorded with the clerk of the circuit court. The 789 expedited process must include an application for an applicant 790 to identify the percentage of planned homes, not to exceed 50 791 percent of the residential subdivision or a planned community, 792 or the number of building permits that the governing body must 793 issue for the residential subdivision or planned community. The 794 application or the local governmentâs final approval may not 795 alter or restrict the applicant from receiving the number of 796 building permits requested, so long as the request does not 797 exceed 50 percent of the planned homes of the residential 798 subdivision or planned community or the number of building 799 permits. This paragraph does not: 800 1.âRestrict the governing body from issuing more than 50 801 percent of the building permits for the residential subdivision 802 or planned community. 803 2.âApply to a county subject to s. 380.0552. 804 (b)âSubject to the requirements under paragraph (6)(b), a 805 governing body that had a program in place before July 1, 2023, 806 to expedite the building permit process, need only update its 807 their program to approve an applicantâs written application to 808 issue up to 50 percent of the building permits for the 809 residential subdivision or planned community in order to comply 810 with this section. This paragraph does not restrict a governing 811 body from issuing more than 50 percent of the building permits 812 for the residential subdivision or planned community. 813 (d)1.âIf a governing body fails to adopt a program under 814 paragraph (a) or paragraph (c), or fails to update or modify an 815 existing program as required under paragraph (b), by the 816 applicable statutory deadline, the following will apply without 817 further action or approval by the governing body and 818 notwithstanding any conflicting local requirement: 819 a.âThe applicant has an unconditional, self-executing right 820 to use a qualified contractor of the applicantâs choosing, 821 within the scope of the contractorâs professional licensure and 822 as authorized under this section, to perform technical review 823 and certification necessary to support the issuance of up to 75 824 percent of the building permits for the residential subdivision 825 or planned community, including one or more phases thereof, 826 before the final plat is recorded, provided the qualified 827 contractor does not have a conflict of interest. For the 828 purposes of this paragraph, the term âconflict of interestâ has 829 the same meaning as in s. 112.312. 830 b.âThe governing body, local building official, and any 831 local government staff may not condition, delay, limit, 832 restrict, obstruct, or deny the applicantâs use of a qualified 833 contractor under this paragraph. This paragraph does not 834 prohibit a local government from applying neutral, generally 835 applicable requirements relating to procurement, contracting, 836 insurance, indemnification, conflict-of-interest review, 837 credential verification, recordkeeping, or public safety, 838 provided such requirements do not materially impair or frustrate 839 the applicantâs ability to use a qualified contractor as 840 authorized by this paragraph. Any local requirement that 841 directly conflicts with this paragraph is preempted to the 842 extent of the conflict. 843 c.âThe qualified contractor may perform all technical 844 review services within the scope of his or her licensure and 845 qualifications which are necessary to obtain such building 846 permits as specifically authorized under this section, including 847 preparing, reviewing, and submitting permit applications and 848 supporting plans, specifications, and documents, and providing 849 signed and sealed documents when required by law. The local 850 building official must accept such submissions when prepared and 851 sealed by the qualified contractor as meeting any local 852 requirement that the submission be prepared or reviewed by local 853 government staff, and must review and issue the permits in 854 accordance with the Florida Building Code and applicable state 855 law. This paragraph does not limit the authority of the local 856 building official to review such submission by a qualified 857 contractor for compliance with the Florida Building Code and 858 applicable state law, to identify deficiencies, or to approve or 859 deny the permit in accordance with the law. 860 d.âThe governing body and the local building official may 861 not unreasonably require the applicant or the qualified 862 contractor to use a local government registry, rotation, or 863 shortlist, or any other selection or vetting process, which has 864 the effect of denying or materially delaying the applicantâs use 865 of a qualified contractor under this section. 866 e.âThe unconditional right provided by this paragraph 867 becomes effective immediately upon the governing bodyâs failure 868 to meet the applicable deadlines in paragraph (a) or paragraph 869 (c), continues in effect unless and until the governing body has 870 adopted or updated a program fully compliant with this section, 871 and may not be limited, impaired, or applied retroactively to 872 reduce the number or percentage of building permits the 873 applicant may obtain or is eligible to obtain under this 874 paragraph. 875 2.âThis paragraph may not be construed to limit or impair 876 the authority of the local building official to enforce the 877 Florida Building Code, the Florida Fire Prevention Code, or 878 other applicable state laws and local laws of general 879 application in reviewing and issuing building permits; however, 880 the governing body and the local building official may not 881 impose any additional local procedures, prerequisites, or 882 substantive standards on the applicant or the qualified 883 contractor which have the effect of conditioning, delaying, 884 restricting, or denying the use of a qualified contractor as 885 authorized by this paragraph. 886 (3)âA governing body shall create: 887 (a)âA two-step application process for the adoption of a 888 preliminary plat, and for stabilized access roads that can 889 support emergency vehicles, inclusive of any plans, in order to 890 expedite the issuance of building permits under this section. 891 The application must allow an applicant to identify the 892 percentage of planned homes or the number of building permits 893 that the governing body must issue for the residential 894 subdivision, or planned community, or one or more phases of a 895 multiphased planned community or subdivision. 896 (4)(a)âAn applicant may use a private provider or qualified 897 contractor in the same manner as provided in pursuant to s. 898 553.791 to expedite the application process for building permits 899 after a preliminary plat is approved under this section. 900 (b)âA governing body shall, upon the written request of the 901 applicant, use the qualified contractor registry established in 902 s. 163.3169 establish a registry of at least three qualified 903 contractors whom the governing body may use to supplement staff 904 resources in ways determined by the governing body for 905 processing and expediting the review of an application for a 906 preliminary plat or any plans related to such application. A 907 qualified contractor on the registry who is hired pursuant to 908 this section to review an application, or any part thereof, for 909 a preliminary plat, or any part thereof, may not have a conflict 910 of interest with the applicant. For purposes of this paragraph, 911 the term âconflict of interestâ has the same meaning as in s. 912 112.312. 913 (6)âThe governing body must issue the number or percentage 914 of building permits requested by an applicant in accordance with 915 the Florida Building Code and this section, provided the 916 residential buildings or structures are unoccupied and all of 917 the following conditions are met: 918 (b)âThe applicant provides proof to the governing body that 919 the applicant has provided a copy of the approved preliminary 920 plat, along with the approved plans, to the relevant electric, 921 gas, water, and wastewater utilities. For purposes of this 922 paragraph, the term âapproved plansâ means plans approved for 923 design and permit review and does not include, and may not be 924 construed to require or imply, any certification, attestation, 925 or confirmation of the completion of construction of any 926 subdivision or planned community infrastructure, or improvements 927 depicted in, referenced by, or required under such plans, except 928 for the construction of the minimum access and roadway 929 improvements required by the Florida Fire Prevention Code for 930 fire department access and operations, such as a stabilized 931 roadway for emergency access. No other subdivision or planned 932 community infrastructure or improvements may be required to be 933 constructed as a condition of building permit issuance or 934 approval authorized under this section. 935 1.âA local government may not condition, delay, withhold, 936 or deny the issuance of any building permit authorized under 937 this section on: 938 a.âThe actual completion, substantial completion, or 939 physical installation of any subdivision or planned community 940 infrastructure, or improvements identified in the approved 941 preliminary plat or approved plans; 942 b.âThe submission, acceptance, or approval of any 943 certification of completion or similar documentation, including, 944 but not limited to, certificates of completion or substantial 945 completion, engineerâs or architectâs certifications of 946 completion, as-built or record drawings, pressure or compaction 947 test results, utility acceptance letters, service availability 948 letters, or similar confirmations of finished construction or 949 readiness for service; or 950 c.âCompliance with an environmental condition which is not 951 required by its land development regulations, a local government 952 comprehensive plan, a regulatory covenant or similar recorded 953 instrument, a decision or order by a local zoning board or other 954 quasi-judicial board, or by state law or federal law to obtain a 955 building permit. 956 2.âThis prohibition applies notwithstanding any ordinance, 957 resolution, policy, practice, permit condition, concurrency or 958 proportionate-share requirement, interlocal agreement, utility 959 policy or standard, or other local requirement to the contrary. 960 3.âThis paragraph may not be construed to prohibit a local 961 government from requiring documentation strictly necessary to 962 demonstrate compliance with the Florida Fire Prevention Code as 963 a condition of issuing building permits; however, such 964 documentation may not require the physical completion of the 965 subdivision or planned community infrastructure, or improvements 966 beyond what is expressly required to satisfy the Florida Fire 967 Prevention Code. 968 969 This paragraph may not be construed to relieve an applicant from 970 completing or installing any infrastructure or improvements as a 971 condition of issuance of a certificate of occupancy. 972 (c)âThe applicant holds a valid performance bond for up to 973 130 percent of the necessary improvements, as defined in s. 974 177.031(9), that have not been completed upon submission of the 975 application under this section. For purposes of a master planned 976 community as defined in s. 163.3202(5)(b), a valid performance 977 bond is required on a phase-by-phase basis. For purposes of this 978 section, a local government may waive the bond requirement in 979 this paragraph through its program or on a case-by-case basis 980 upon request of the applicant. 981 (8)âFor purposes of this section, an applicant has a vested 982 right in a preliminary plat that has been approved by a 983 governing body for the earlier of at least 5 years or if all of 984 the following conditions are met: 985 (a)âThe applicant relies in good faith on the approved 986 preliminary plat or any amendments thereto. 987 (b)âThe applicant incurs obligations and expenses, 988 commences construction of the residential subdivision or planned 989 community, and is continuing in good faith with the development 990 of the property. 991 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.